Illinois, session 104th, SB4124.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $2,479,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Commission on Equity and Inclusion for the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Commission. 9    Section 10. The sum of $2,867,500, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Commission on Equity and Inclusion for the 12ordinary and contingent expenses of the Business Enterprise 13Program. 14    Section 15. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Commission on Equity and Inclusion for the ordinary and 17contingent expenses of a disparity study. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.